Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.340

Liability of merchants and other parties for creating a property crime database—Information sharing.

Merchants and other parties who create a database of individuals who have been: Apprehended in the process of committing a property crime; assessed a civil fine or penalty for committing a property crime; or convicted of a property crime are not subject to civil fines or penalties for sharing information from the database with other merchants, law enforcement officials, or legal professionals.

[ 2009 c 431 s 19.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.